Florida, session 2026, HB91.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of
section 99.021, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraphs
(f) and (g) are added to that subsection, to read:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb91 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 91, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
99.021 Form of candidate oath.—
(1)
(b) In addition, any person seeking to qualify for
nomination as a candidate of any political party shall, at the
time of subscribing to the oath or affirmation, state in
writing:
1. The party of which the person is a member.
2. That the person has been a registered member of the
political party for which he or she is seeking nomination as a
candidate for at least 365 consecutive days preceding before the
beginning of qualifying before preceding the general election
for which the person seeks to qualify.
3. That the person has paid the assessment levied against
him or her, if any, as a candidate for said office by the
executive committee of the party of which he or she is a member.
4. That the person has not legally changed his or her name
through a petition pursuant to s. 68.07 during the 365-day
period preceding the beginning of qualifying. This subparagraph
does not apply to any change of name in proceedings for
dissolution of marriage or adoption of children or based on a
change of name conducted with a marriage certificate.
(c) In addition, any person seeking to qualify for office
as a candidate with no party affiliation shall, at the time of
subscribing to the oath or affirmation, state in writing that he
or she is registered without any party affiliation and that he
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb91 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 91, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
or she has not:
1. Been a registered member of any political party for at
least 365 consecutive days preceding before the beginning of
qualifying before preceding the general election for which the
person seeks to qualify.
2. Legally changed his or her name through a petition
pursuant to s. 68.07 during the 365-day period preceding the
beginning of qualifying. This subparagraph does not apply to any
change of name in proceedings for dissolution of marriage or
adoption of children or based on a change of name conducted with
a marriage certificate.
(f) The statements in subparagraph (b)4. and subparagraph
(c)2. constitute substantive requirements for the person
completing the statement, and compliance with those requirements
is mandatory. The sole method to enforce compliance with such
requirements is contained in this paragraph. Compliance with
subparagraph (b)4. and subparagraph (c)2. may be challenged by a
qualified candidate or a political party with qualified
candidates in the same race by filing an action in the circuit
court for the county in which the qualifying officer is
headquartered. A person may not be qualified as a candidate for
nomination or election and his or her name may not appear on the
ballot if in an order that has become final, the court
determines that the person seeking to qualify has legally
changed his or her name through a petition pursuant to s. 68.07
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb91 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 91, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
during the 365-day period preceding the beginning of qualifying,
unless such change of name occurred in proceedings for
dissolution of marriage or adoption of children or was based on
a change of name conducted with a marriage certificate.
(g) The statements in subparagraph (b)2. and subparagraph
(c)1. constitute substantive requirements for the person
completing the statement, and compliance with those requirements
is mandatory. The sole method to enforce compliance with such
requirements is contained in this paragraph. Compliance with
subparagraph (b)2. and subparagraph (c)1. may be challenged by a
qualified candidate or a political party with qualified
candidates in the same race by filing an action in the circuit
court for the county in which the qualifying officer is
headquartered. A person may not be qualified as a candidate for
nomination or election and his or her name may not appear on the
ballot if in an order that has become final, the court
determines that:
1. The person seeking to qualify for nomination as a
candidate of any political party has not been a registered
member of that party for the 365-day period preceding the
beginning of qualifying; or
2. The person seeking to qualify for office as a candidate
with no party affiliation has not been registered without party
affiliation for, or has been a registered member of any
100 political party during, the 365-day period preceding the
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb91 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 91, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
101 beginning of qualifying.
102 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb91 -02-er